Hawaii statutes.
§54-34 Penalties. Any person who
violates any rule or regulation made and promulgated by the board of water
supply pursuant to section 54-33 shall be fined not more than $500, except that
in cases where the offense shall be of a continuing nature each day's
continuance of the same, after written notice from the board to remedy the
same, shall constitute a separate offense. [L 1963, c 191, pt of §1; Supp,
§145A-24; HRS §54-34]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next